Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2219.02
Workfile, defined.

Workfile means documentation necessary to support a real property appraiser's analysis, opinions, and conclusions.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 39;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 68;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 6.